Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1623
Retail marketers; liability insurance; employees; training requirements; violation; penalty.

All retail marketers of retail propane in Nebraska shall carry minimum liability insurance coverage of at least two million dollars, with proof of insurance provided to the State Fire Marshal. All persons employed in the installation or service of any propane system shall fully comply with training requirements provided in applicable sections governing the sale of propane as set forth by the National Fire Protection Association. Applicable requirements for guidelines as set forth by the National Fire Protection Association shall be enforced by the office of the State Fire Marshal.

Violation of this section shall subject the violator to a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars per day and not more than one thousand dollars per day. In case of a continuing violation, each day constitutes a separate offense. The amount of the penalty shall be based on the degree and extent of the violation. The Attorney General or each county attorney to whom the State Fire Marshal reports a violation shall institute appropriate proceedings without delay to assure compliance with this section.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 23.